el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ για αξίνες & σκαπάνες: Λαβές για αξίνες & σκαπάνες
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์พลั่ว: ด้ามจับพลั่ว
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství ke krumpáčům a motykám: Násady ke krumpáčům a motykám
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do oskardów i kilofów: Styliska do oskardów i kilofów
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для мотыг и кирок: Рукоятки для кирок и мотыг
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till hackor och spetshackor: Handtag till hackor och spetshackor
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para azadón y pico: Mangos de azadón y pico
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Kuokka- ja hakkutarvikkeet: Kuokan ja hakun varret
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Accessoires voor pikhouwelen: Stelen voor pikhouwelen
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Kauptukų ir kirtiklių priedai: Kauptukų ir kirtiklių rankenos
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Tilbehør til hakker: Håndtak til hakker
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour haches et pioches: Manches pour haches et pioches
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 넓은날 곡괭이/곡괭이 부대용품: 넓은날 곡괭이/곡괭이 손잡이
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za motike in krampe: Ročaji za motike in krampe
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Csákánykiegészítők: Csákányfogantyúk
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за мотики и кирки: Дръжки за мотика и кирка
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii pentru sape late și târnăcoape: Cozi pentru sape late și târnăcoape
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo ku krompáčom a motykám: Rukoväte pre krompáče a motyky
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Mattock & Pickaxe Accessories: Mattock & Pickaxe Handles
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Zubehör für Hacken & Pickel: Griffe für Hacken & Pickel
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de alvião e picareta: Cabos de alvião e picareta
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện cuốc chim: Tay cầm cuốc chim
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Tilbehør til hakker og spidshakker: Håndtag til hakker og spidshakker
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za motike i pijuke: Drške za motike i pijuke
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 十字鎬/鍬配件: 十字鎬/鍬握把
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 鹤嘴锄/镐配件: 鹤嘴锄把/镐把
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para enxadas e picaretas: Cabos para enxadas e picaretas
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Çapa ve Kazma Aksesuarları: Çapa ve Kazma Sapları
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori per zappascuri e picconi: Manici per zappascuri e picconi
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > マトック・つるはし関連用品: マトック・つるはし用ハンドル